Utah statutes.
4-32-9.   Additional powers of commissioner.

(1)  The commissioner may:

(a) gather and compile information concerning and, to investigate the organization, business, conduct, practices, and management of any person subject to this chapter;

(b) require any person subject to this chapter to file information regarding the person's business or operation as the commissioner requires;

(c)  for the purpose of this chapter, at all reasonable times have access to, for the purpose of examination, and the right to copy any documentary evidence, of any person being investigated or proceeded against, and may require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of all documentary evidence of any person relating to any matter under investigation;

(d) require the attendance of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence at any place designated for hearing; in case of disobedience to a subpoena, the commissioner may invoke the aid of any court of competent jurisdiction to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence; and

(e) order testimony to be taken by deposition in any proceeding or investigation pending under this chapter at any stage of the proceeding or investigation; the depositions may be taken before any person with power to administer oaths designated by the commissioner, and the testimony shall be reduced to writing by the person taking the deposition, or under his direction and shall then be subscribed by the deponent.

(2) In the event a witness asserts a privilege against self-incrimination, testimony and evidence from the witness may be compelled pursuant to Title 77, Chapter 22b, Grants of Immunity.

(3) (a)  Any person who without just cause neglects or refuses to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry, or to produce documentary evidence, if in his power to do so, in obedience to the subpoena or lawful requirement of the commissioner is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.  Any fine imposed may not be less than $500.

(b)  Any person that willfully makes, or causes to be made, any false entry or statement of fact in any report required to be made under this chapter, or that willfully makes, or causes to be made, any false entry in any account, record, or memorandum kept by any person subject to this chapter, or that neglects or fails to make, or to cause to be made, full, true, and correct entries in those accounts, records, or memoranda, of all facts and transactions appertaining to the business of that person or that willfully removes out of the jurisdiction of this state, or willfully mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary evidence of any person subject to this chapter or that willfully refuses to submit to the commissioner or to any of the commissioner's authorized agents, for the purpose of inspection and making copies, any documentary evidence of any person subject to this chapter within the person's possession or control is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.  Any fine imposed may not be less than $500.

(c)  If any person required by this chapter to file any annual or special report fails to do so within the time fixed by the commissioner, and the failure continues for 30 days after notice of default, the person shall forfeit to the state the sum of $10 for each day of the continuance of the failure, which forfeiture is payable into the treasury of this state, and is recoverable in a civil suit in the name of the state brought in the district where the person has a principal office or in any district in which he does business.  The various county attorneys, under the direction of the attorney general of this state, shall prosecute for the recovery of the forfeitures.  The costs and expenses of prosecution shall be paid out of the appropriation for the expenses of the courts of this state.



Amended by Chapter 296, 1997 General Session

